Nevada, session 83, AB393.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 449 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, NRS
433.264, 433B.150, 450.180, 450.640 and 630.365 or any other
provision of law, a hospital or psychiatric hospital shall not
employ as an employee a physician for the purpose of engaging in
the practice of medicine, homeopathic medicine or osteopathic
medicine.
2. A hospital or psychiatric hospital may employ as an
employee a physician:
(a) Who is participating in a graduate program approved by
the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education, or its
successor organization, for the purpose of engaging in the practice
of medicine, homeopathic medicine or osteopathic medicine; or
(b) If the hospital or psychiatric hospital is owned or operated
by the State Government.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Homeopathic medicine” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 630A.040.
(b) “Osteopathic medicine” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 633.081.
(c) “Practice of medicine” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 630.020.
-
*AB393*

– 3 –
Sec. 2. NRS 449.0301 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.0301 The provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428,
inclusive, and section 1 of this act do not apply to:
1. Any facility conducted by and for the adherents of any
church or religious denomination for the purpose of providing
facilities for the care and treatment of the sick who depend solely
upon spiritual means through prayer for healing in the practice of
the religion of the church or denomination, except that such a
facility shall comply with all regulations relative to sanitation and
safety applicable to other facilities of a similar category.
2. Foster homes as defined in NRS 424.014.
3. Any medical facility, facility for the dependent or facility
which is otherwise required by the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed that is operated and
maintained by the United States Government or an agency thereof.
Sec. 3. NRS 449.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.160 1. The Division may deny an application for a
license or may suspend or revoke any license issued under the
provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and section 1 of
this act upon any of the following grounds:
(a) Violation by the applicant or the licensee of any of the
provisions of NRS 439B.410, 449.029 to 449.245, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act or 449A.100 to 449A.124, inclusive, and
449A.270 to 449A.286, inclusive, or of any other law of this State
or of the standards, rules and regulations adopted thereunder.
(b) Aiding, abetting or permitting the commission of any illegal
act.
(c) Conduct inimical to the public health, morals, welfare and
safety of the people of the State of Nevada in the maintenance and
operation of the premises for which a license is issued.
(d) Conduct or practice detrimental to the health or safety of the
occupants or employees of the facility.
(e) Failure of the applicant to obtain written approval from the
Director of the Department of Health and Human Services as
required by NRS 439A.100 or 439A.102 or as provided in any
regulation adopted pursuant to NRS 449.001 to 449.430, inclusive,
and section 1 of this act and 449.435 to 449.531, inclusive, and
chapter 449A of NRS if such approval is required, including,
without limitation, the closure or conversion of any hospital in a
county whose population is 100,000 or more that is owned by the
licensee without approval pursuant to NRS 439A.102.
(f) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 441A.315 and
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto or NRS 449.2486.
(g) Violation of the provisions of NRS 458.112.
-
*AB393*

– 4 –
(h) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 449A.170 to
449A.192, inclusive, and any regulation adopted pursuant thereto.
(i) Violation of the provisions of NRS 629.260.
2. In addition to the provisions of subsection 1, the Division
may revoke a license to operate a facility for the dependent if, with
respect to that facility, the licensee that operates the facility, or an
agent or employee of the licensee:
(a) Is convicted of violating any of the provisions of
NRS 202.470;
(b) Is ordered to but fails to abate a nuisance pursuant to NRS
244.360, 244.3603 or 268.4124; or
(c) Is ordered by the appropriate governmental agency to correct
a violation of a building, safety or health code or regulation but fails
to correct the violation.
3. The Division shall maintain a log of any complaints that it
receives relating to activities for which the Division may revoke the
license to operate a facility for the dependent pursuant to subsection
2. The Division shall provide to a facility for the care of adults
during the day:
(a) A summary of a complaint against the facility if the
investigation of the complaint by the Division either substantiates
the complaint or is inconclusive;
(b) A report of any investigation conducted with respect to the
complaint; and
(c) A report of any disciplinary action taken against the facility.
 The facility shall make the information available to the public
pursuant to NRS 449.2486.
4. On or before February 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
Division shall submit to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau a written report setting forth, for the previous biennium:
(a) Any complaints included in the log maintained by the
Division pursuant to subsection 3; and
(b) Any disciplinary actions taken by the Division pursuant to
subsection 2.
Sec. 4. NRS 449.163 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.163 1. In addition to the payment of the amount required
by NRS 449.0308, if a medical facility, facility for the dependent or
facility which is required by the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed violates any provision
related to its licensure, including any provision of NRS 439B.410 or
449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and section 1 of this act or any
condition, standard or regulation adopted by the Board, the
Division, in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to
NRS 449.165, may:
-
*AB393*

– 5 –
(a) Prohibit the facility from admitting any patient until it
determines that the facility has corrected the violation;
(b) Limit the occupancy of the facility to the number of beds
occupied when the violation occurred, until it determines that the
facility has corrected the violation;
(c) If the license of the facility limits the occupancy of the
facility and the facility has exceeded the approved occupancy,
require the facility, at its own expense, to move patients to another
facility that is licensed;
(d) Except where a greater penalty is authorized by subsection 2,
impose an administrative penalty of not more than $5,000 per day
for each violation, together with interest thereon at a rate not to
exceed 10 percent per annum; and
(e) Appoint temporary management to oversee the operation of
the facility and to ensure the health and safety of the patients of the
facility, until:
(1) It determines that the facility has corrected the violation
and has management which is capable of ensuring continued
compliance with the applicable statutes, conditions, standards and
regulations; or
(2) Improvements are made to correct the violation.
2. If an off-campus location of a hospital fails to obtain a
national provider identifier that is distinct from the national provider
identifier used by the main campus and any other off-campus
location of the hospital in violation of NRS 449.1818, the Division
may impose against the hospital an administrative penalty of not
more than $10,000 for each day of such failure, together with
interest thereon at a rate not to exceed 10 percent per annum, in
addition to any other action authorized by this chapter.
3. If the facility fails to pay any administrative penalty imposed
pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 or subsection 2, the
Division may:
(a) Suspend the license of the facility until the administrative
penalty is paid; and
(b) Collect court costs, reasonable attorney’s fees and other
costs incurred to collect the administrative penalty.
4. The Division may require any facility that violates any
provision of NRS 439B.410 or 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act or any condition, standard or regulation adopted
by the Board to make any improvements necessary to correct the
violation.
5. Any money collected as administrative penalties pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 1 or subsection 2 must be accounted for
separately and used to administer and carry out the provisions of
NRS 449.001 to 449.430, inclusive, and section 1 of this act,
-
*AB393*

– 6 –
449.435 to 449.531, inclusive, and chapter 449A of NRS to protect
the health, safety, well-being and property of the patients and
residents of facilities in accordance with applicable state and federal
standards or for any other purpose authorized by the Legislature.
Sec. 5. NRS 449.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.220 1. The Division may bring an action in the name of
the State to enjoin any person, state or local government unit or
agency thereof from operating or maintaining any facility within the
meaning of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive [:] , and section 1
of this act:
(a) Without first obtaining a license therefor; or
(b) After his or her license has been revoked or suspended by
the Division.
2. It is sufficient in such action to allege that the defendant did,
on a certain date and in a certain place, operate and maintain such a
facility without a license.
Sec. 6. NRS 449.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.240 The district attorney of the county in which the facility
is located shall, upon application by the Division, institute and
conduct the prosecution of any action for violation of any provisions
of NRS 449.029 to 449.245, inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act.
Sec. 7. NRS 449.241 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.241 As used in NRS 449.241 to 449.2428, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 449.2413 to 449.2418, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 8. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB393*